Utah statutes.
32A-4a-205.   Bond.
(1) (a)  A resort licensee shall procure and post a cash or corporate surety
bond payable to the department in the penal sum of $25,000.
(b)  A resort licensee shall maintain the bond described in Subsection (1)(a)
for as long as the resort licensee operates as a resort licensee.
(c)  A resort licensee is not required to have a separate bond for each
sublicense, except that the aggregate of any bonds posted by the resort
licensee shall cover each sublicense under the resort license.
(2)  A bond described in Subsection (1) shall be in a form approved by the
attorney general, conditioned upon the resort licensee's faithful compliance
with this title and the rules of the commission.
(3) (a)  If a bond described in Subsection (1) is canceled due to a resort
licensee's negligence, the commission may assess a $300 reinstatement fee.
(b)  No part of a bond described in Subsection (1) may be withdrawn:
(i)  during the period a resort license is in effect; or
(ii)  while a revocation proceeding is pending against the resort licensee
that posts the bond.
(c)  A bond filed by a resort licensee may be forfeited if the resort license
is revoked.
